District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.04

Term of office.

Members of the Commission shall serve terms not to exceed 3 years, which shall regularly commence on October 29th in the year of appointment and expire on October 28th 3 years later. The terms shall be staggered so that 5 terms expire each year on October 28th. Members may be reappointed but may not serve more than 2 consecutive terms.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 404, 22 DCR 2461
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-73, § 4(c), 28 DCR 5276
1981 Ed., § 6-2224.
1973 Ed., § 6-1724.